Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-114
Bonds; sureties; public officers or deputies and attorneys, ineligible.

No state or county officers, or their deputies, shall be taken as security on the bond of any administrator, executor, or other officer from whom by law bond is or may be required, and no practicing attorney shall be taken as surety on any official bond, or bond in any legal proceedings in the district in which he may reside.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 14, p. 97;

R.S.1913, § 5720;

C.S.1922, § 5050;

C.S.1929, § 12-114;

R.S.1943, § 11-114.

A practicing attorney should not sign in a legal proceeding as surety, but if bond is approved, the attorney is estopped from alleging its invalidity and it may be enforced against him. In re Estate of Kothe, 131 Neb. 531, 268 N.W. 464 (1936), judgment of affirmance vacated on rehearing, 131 Neb. 780, 270 N.W. 117 (1936).

A practicing attorney is not a proper surety on an appeal bond, but bond is not invalid. Chase v. Omaha L. & T. Co., 56 Neb. 358, 76 N.W. 896 (1898).

Attorney should not become a surety upon a bond in a legal proceeding, and if he signs such a bond the clerk should not approve it. If it is approved, the surety is bound thereby. Luce v. Foster, 42 Neb. 818, 60 N.W. 1027 (1894); Tessier v. Crowley, 17 Neb. 207, 22 N.W. 422 (1885).